trunk/incubator/apertium-en-el.el.dix
    <pardef n="χάρτ/ης__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ης</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>η</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>η</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>η</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ες</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ες</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ών</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ες</l>
          <r>ης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="παιδ/ί__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ί</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ί</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ιού</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ί</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ιά</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ιά</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ιών</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ιά</l>
          <r>ί<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="βιβλί/ο__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ο</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ο</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ου</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ο</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>α</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>α</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ων</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>α</l>
          <r>ο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="πρόβλημ/α__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>α</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>α</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ατος</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>α</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ατα</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ατα</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>άτων</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ατα</l>
          <r>α<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="χάρτης"><i>χάρτ</i><par n="χάρτ/ης__n"/></e>
    <e lm="παιδί"><i>παιδ</i><par n="παιδ/ί__n"/></e>
    <e lm="βιβλίο"><i>βιβλί</i><par n="βιβλί/ο__n"/></e>
    <e lm="πρόβλημα"><i>πρόβλημ</i><par n="πρόβλημ/α__n"/></e>
